errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ############################## !
!This file contains the numerals !
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON Numeral
 MILJON ;           ! a noun of its own
 UNDERDUHAT ;       ! for generator under 1000
 JUSTDUHAT ;        ! going via 1000
 OVERDUHAT ;     ! for generator over 1000
 OLD ;           ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.
num-imprecise ;
num-collective ;
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;          ! for the arabic numerals        !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals         !
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.                   !
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                     !
11TO99F ;
21TO99 ;
DUHAT ;
1TO9DUHAT ;
O-NUPPELOHKAI ;
NUPPELOHKAICUODI ;


! We now run through the alphabetic numerals, ending up with the case
! inflection of the final number.

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILJON
miljon+Num+Sg+Nom:miljon%> K ;                !Num or N?
miljun+Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:miljun%> K ;                         !
miljovdna:miljovdna OKTA ;
millijovdna:millijovdna OKTA ;
millijuvdna:millijuvdna OKTA ;
miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljovnnag VUOSTTAS ;    ! This should NOT be N, since it is the starting point of the Ordinal
miljovnnat+A+Ord:millijovnnag VUOSTTAS ;
miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljonag VUOSTTAS ;
miljárda:miljár'da OKTA ;         !Num or N?
miljárddat+A+Ord:miljárddag VUOSTTAS ;



! Overduhat, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON OVERDUHAT
O-OKTAF ;
O-2TO9F ;
 O-JUSTLOGIF ; ! 10000
 O-2TO9LOG ;   ! 20000, 30000, ...
 O-NUPPELOT ;  ! 11000, 12000, ...
 O-CUODI ;     ! 100000
 O-2TO9CUO ;   ! 200000, 300000, ...

! All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-.
! They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.


! Thousands

LEXICON O-OKTAF
okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
JUSTDUHAT ;
DUHAT ;


LEXICON O-2TO9F
guokte#   JUSTDUHAT ;
golbma#   JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
vihtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
guhtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
čieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
gieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
gávcci#   JUSTDUHAT ;
ovcci#    JUSTDUHAT ;

LEXICON 1TO9DUHAT
ok0ta#duhát:ok'ta OKTADUHAT ;
guokte#duhát:guok't GUOKTEDUHAT ;
nubbe#duhát:nubb NUBBEDUHAT ;
golbma#duhát:golbma GOLBMADUHAT ;
njeallje#duhát:njeallj GUOKTEDUHAT ;
njeallja#duhát+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja#duhát%> K ;
njeallja#duhát+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#duhát%> K ;
njeallja#duhát+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#duhát%> K ;
njeallja#duhát+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#duháh%>a K ;
njeallja#duhát+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#duháh%>a K ;                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                     vihtta#duhát:vi VIHTTADUHAT ;
guhtta#duhát:gu VIHTTADUHAT ;
čieža#duhát:či CIEZADUHAT ;
gieža#duhát:gi CIEZADUHAT ;
gávcci#duhát:gák'ci GAVCCIDUHAT ;
ovcci#duhát:ok'ci GAVCCIDUHAT ;



! Tens of thousands

LEXICON O-JUSTLOGIF
logi# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi# DUHAT ;
! This lexicon is for the number 10000 only. it is separated from the
! rest to avoid forms like *logivihttaduhát, etc.


LEXICON O-LOGIF
logi# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi# DUHAT ;
logi#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi#okta# DUHAT ;
logi#akta# DUHAT ;
logi#guokte# DUHAT ;
logi#golbma# DUHAT ;
logi#njeallje# DUHAT ;
logi#njeallja# DUHAT ;
logi#vihtta# DUHAT ;
logi#guhtta# DUHAT ;
logi#čieža# DUHAT ;
logi#gieža# DUHAT ;
logi#gávcci# DUHAT ;
logi#ovcci# DUHAT ;


! this lexicon is accessed only via other O-lexica, and not directly
! from OVERDUHAT. Thus, *logivihttaduhát, etc. is avoided.

LEXICON O-2TO9LOG
guokte# O-LOGIF ;
golbma# O-LOGIF ;
njeallje# O-LOGIF ;
njeallja# O-LOGIF ;
vihtta# O-LOGIF ;
guhtta# O-LOGIF ;
čieža# O-LOGIF ;
gieža# O-LOGIF ;
gávcci# O-LOGIF ;
ovcci# O-LOGIF ;


! Teens of thousands

LEXICON O-NUPPELOT
okta# O-NL ;
akta# O-NL ;
guokte# O-NL ;
golbma# O-NL ;
njeallje# O-NL ;
njeallja# O-NL ;
vihtta# O-NL ;
guhtta# O-NL ;
čieža# O-NL ;
gieža# O-NL ;
gávcci# O-NL ;
ovcci# O-NL ;

LEXICON O-NL
nuppe#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
nuppe#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
nuppe#lot# DUHAT ;
goalmmát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
goalmmát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
goalmmát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
goalmmát#lot# DUHAT ;
njealját#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
njealját#lohkái# DUHAT ;
njealját#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
njealját#lot# DUHAT ;
viđát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
viđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
viđát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
viđát#lot# DUHAT ;
guđát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
guđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
guđát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
guđát#lot# DUHAT ;
čihččet#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
čihččet#lohkái# DUHAT ;
čihččet#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
čihččet#lot# DUHAT ;
gávccát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
gávccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
gávccát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
gávccát#lot# DUHAT ;
ovccát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
ovccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
ovccát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
ovccát#lot# DUHAT ;
logát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
logát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
logát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
logát#lot# DUHAT ;

LEXICON O-NUPPELOHKAI
nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
nuppe#lot# DUHAT ;
goalmmát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
goalmmát#lot# DUHAT ;
njealját#lohkái# DUHAT ;
njealját#lot# DUHAT ;
viđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
viđát#lot# DUHAT ;
guđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
guđát#lot# DUHAT ;
čihččet#lohkái# DUHAT ;
čihččet#lot# DUHAT ;
gávccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
gávccát#lot# DUHAT ;
ovccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
ovccát#lot# DUHAT ;
logát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
logát#lot# DUHAT ;


! Hundreds of thousands

LEXICON O-2TO9CUO
guokte# O-GCUO ;
golbma# O-GCUO ;
njeallje# O-GCUO ;
njeallja# O-GCUO ;
vihtta# O-GCUO ;
guhtta# O-GCUO ;
čieža# O-GCUO ;
gieža# O-GCUO ;
gávcci# O-GCUO ;
ovcci# O-GCUO ;

LEXICON O-GCUO
 čuođi# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuođi# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuođi# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuođi#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#okta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# DUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# DUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# DUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# DUHAT ;
 čuođi# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
 čuođi# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 čuođi# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...


LEXICON DUHAT
duhát:duháh DUHATCASE ;

! Justduhat, for numrals going via 1000
! -------------------------------------

LEXICON JUSTDUHAT
 duhát# UNDERDUHAT ;  ! Thousand-and-something
duháhat+A+Ord:duháha DUHAHAT ;
duhát# 111TO119 ;
duhát# 21TO99 ;
duhát# LOGIF ;


! Old, for the old counting thirteen hundred etc.
! -----------------------------------------------

LEXICON O-CUODI
 čuođi# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuođi# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuođi# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuođi#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuođi#okta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#akta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guokte# DUHAT ;
čuođi#golbma# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallje# DUHAT ;
čuođi#njeallja# DUHAT ;
čuođi#vihtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#guhtta# DUHAT ;
čuođi#čieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gieža# DUHAT ;
čuođi#gávcci# DUHAT ;
čuođi#ovcci# DUHAT ;
 čuođi# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
 čuođi# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 čuođi# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
 okta#čuohti# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 okta#čuohti# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
 okta#čuohti# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
okta#čuohti#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#okta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#akta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guokte# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#golbma# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallje# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#njeallja# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#vihtta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#guhtta# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#čieža# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gieža# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#gávcci# DUHAT ;
okta#čuohti#ovcci# DUHAT ;
 okta#čuohti# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
 okta#čuohti# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 okta#čuohti# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
čuohte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohte# DUHAT ;
čuohte# O-OKTAF ;
 čuohti# JUSTDUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuohti# DUHAT ;  ! 100000
 čuohti# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuohti#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
čuohti#okta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#akta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#guokte# DUHAT ;
čuohti#golbma# DUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallje# DUHAT ;
čuohti#njeallja# DUHAT ;
čuohti#vihtta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#guhtta# DUHAT ;
čuohti#čieža# DUHAT ;
čuohti#gieža# DUHAT ;
čuohti#gávcci# DUHAT ;
čuohti#ovcci# DUHAT ;
 čuohti# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
 čuohti# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 čuohti# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
LEXICON num-imprecise
máŋ0ga#nuppe#lohkái#:máŋ'ga#nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
máŋ0ga#logi#:máŋ'ga#logi# DUHAT ;
máŋ0ga#čuođi#:máŋ'ga#čuođi# DUHAT ;
moadde#nuppe#lohkái#:moadde#nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
moadde#logi#:moadde#logi# DUHAT ;
moadde#čuođi#:moadde#čuođi# DUHAT ;
galle#nuppe#lohkái#:galle#nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
galle#logi#:galle#logi# DUHAT ;
galle#čuođi#:galle#čuođi# DUHAT ;
